Utah statutes.
39-1-9.   National Guard subject to call by United States.
(1)  The National Guard of this state is at all times subject to the call of
the President of the United States. When called into the service of the United
States, it is governed by the applicable laws and military regulations of the
United States.
(2)  The National Guard and its members shall attend drills, encampments, and
maneuvers as the president directs.
